Wyoming statutes. Title 34 Property, Conveyances and Security Transactions
Chapter 13 Transfers to Minors

Cross references. —

As to validation of gifts, etc., to religious, educational, etc., uses, see §§

34-5-114

to

34-5-116

.

As to guardian and ward, see title 3.

As to fiduciaries, see title 4.

As to children generally, see title 14.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

38 Am. Jur. 2d Gifts § 16.

Construction and effect of Uniform Gifts to Minors Act, 50 ALR3d 528.

43 C.J.S. Infants § 120 et seq.

§§ 34-13-101 through 34-13-110.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 201, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1967, ch. 154, §§ 1 through 10, constituted the Uniform Gifts to Minors Act.

§§ 34-13-111 through 34-13-113.
[Reserved.]

Reserved.

§ 34-13-114.
Definitions.

As used in this act [§§

34-13-114

through

34-13-137

]:

“Adult” means an individual who has attained the age of twenty-one (21) years;

“Benefit plan” means an employer’s plan for the benefit of an employee or partner;

“Broker” means a person lawfully engaged in the business of effecting transactions in securities or commodities for the person’s own account or for the account of others;

“Conservator” means a person appointed or qualified by a court to act as general, limited or temporary guardian of a minor’s property or a person legally authorized to perform substantially the same functions;

“Court” means the district court;

“Custodial property” means any interest in property transferred to a custodian under this act and the income from and proceeds of that interest in property;

“Custodian” means a person so designated under W.S.

34-13-122

or a successor or substitute custodian designated under W.S.

34-13-131

;

“Financial institution” means a bank, trust company or a savings institution or credit union chartered and supervised under state or federal law;

“Legal representative” means an individual’s personal representative or conservator;

“Member of the minor’s family” means the minor’s parent, stepparent, spouse, grandparent, brother, sister, uncle or aunt, whether of whole or half blood or by adoption;

“Minor” means:

An individual who has not attained the age of twenty-one (21) years; or

An individual who has not attained the age at which the custodian is required to transfer the custodial property to the beneficiary under W.S.

34-13-133

,

34-13-138

or

34-13-139

, when used in reference to the beneficiary for whose benefit custodial property is held or is to be held.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, organization or other legal entity;

“Personal representative” means an executor, administrator, successor personal representative or special administrator of a decedent’s estate or a person legally authorized to perform substantially the same functions;

“Transfer” means a transaction that creates custodial property under W.S.

34-13-122

;

“Transferor” means a person who makes a transfer under this act;

“Trust company” means any legal entity authorized to exercise general trust powers;

“This act” means W.S.

34-13-114

through

34-13-139

.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 201, § 1; 2017 ch. 154, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, added (a)(xi)(B) and made related changes; and added (a)(xvii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Family relationship. —

Where the parties lived together in a home for 12 years with their children, the evidence was sufficient to prove a family relationship for purposes of this section.
Hofstad v. Christie, 2010 WY 134, 240 P.3d 816,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 2010).

§ 34-13-115.
Scope and jurisdiction.

This act [§§

34-13-114

through

34-13-137

] applies to a transfer that refers to this act in the designation under W.S. 34-13-122(a) by which the transfer is made if at the time of the transfer the transferor, the minor or the custodian is a resident of this state or the custodial property is located in this state. The custodianship so created remains subject to this act despite a subsequent change in residence of a transferor, the minor or the custodian or the removal of custodial property from this state.

A person designated as custodian under this act is subject to personal jurisdiction in this state with respect to any matter relating to the custodianship.

A transfer that purports to be made and which is valid under the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act [§§

34-13-114

through

34-13-137

], the Uniform Gifts to Minors Act or a substantially similar act of another state is governed by the law of the designated state and may be executed and enforced in this state if at the time of the transfer, the transferor, the minor or the custodian is a resident of the designated state or the custodial property is located in the designated state.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 201, § 1.

Uniform Gifts to Minors Act. —

The Uniform Gifts to Minors Act, referred to in this section, appeared as §§

34-13-101

through 34-13-110, before being repealed in 1987.

§ 34-13-116.
Nomination of future custodian.

A person having the right to designate the recipient of property transferable upon the occurrence of a future event may revocably nominate a future custodian to receive the property for a minor beneficiary upon the occurrence of the event by naming the future custodian followed in substance by the words: “as custodian for . . . . . (name of minor) under the Wyoming Uniform Transfers to Minors Act [§§

34-13-114

through

34-13-137

]”. The nomination may name one (1) or more persons as substitute future custodians to whom the property shall be transferred, in the order named, if the first nominated future custodian dies before the transfer, or is unable, declines or is ineligible to serve. The nomination may be made in a will, a trust, an instrument exercising a power of appointment or in a writing designating a beneficiary of contractual rights which is delivered to the payor, issuer or other obligor of the contractual rights.

A future custodian nominated under this section shall be a person to whom a transfer of property of that kind may be made under W.S. 34-13-122(a).

The nomination of a future custodian under this section does not create custodial property until the nominating instrument becomes irrevocable or a transfer to the nominated custodian is completed under W.S.

34-13-122

. Unless the nomination of a future custodian has been revoked, upon the occurrence of the future event the custodianship becomes effective and the custodian shall enforce a transfer of the custodial property pursuant to W.S.

34-13-122

.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 201, § 1.

§ 34-13-117.
Transfer by gift or exercise of power of appointment.

A person may make a transfer by irrevocable gift to, or the irrevocable exercise of a power of appointment in favor of, a custodian for the benefit of a minor pursuant to W.S.

34-13-122

.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 201, § 1.

§ 34-13-118.
Transfer authorized by will or trust.

A personal representative or trustee may make an irrevocable transfer pursuant to W.S.

34-13-122

to a custodian for the benefit of a minor as authorized in the governing will or trust.

If the testator or settlor has nominated a future custodian under W.S. 34-13-116(a) to receive the custodial property, the transfer shall be made to that person.

If the testator or settlor has not nominated a future custodian or all persons nominated as future custodian die before the transfer or are unable, decline or are ineligible to serve, the personal representative or the trustee, as the case may be, shall designate the custodian from among those eligible to serve as custodian for property of that kind under W.S. 34-13-122(a).

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 201, § 1.

§ 34-13-119.
Other transfer by fiduciary.

Subject to subsection (c) of this section, a personal representative or trustee may make an irrevocable transfer to another adult or trust company as custodian for the benefit of a minor pursuant to W.S.

34-13-122

, in the absence of a will or under a will or trust that does not contain an authorization to do so.

Subject to subsection (c) of this section, a conservator may make an irrevocable transfer to another adult or trust company as custodian for the benefit of the minor pursuant to W.S.

34-13-122

.

A transfer under subsection (a) or (b) of this section may be made only if:

The personal representative, trustee or conservator considers the transfer to be in the best interest of the minor;

The transfer is not prohibited by or inconsistent with provisions of the applicable will, trust agreement or other governing instrument; and

The transfer is authorized by the court if it exceeds ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) in value.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 201, § 1.

§ 34-13-120.
Transfer by obligor.

Subject to subsections (b) and (c) of this section, a person not subject to W.S.

34-13-118

or

34-13-119

who holds property of or owes a liquidated debt to a minor not having a conservator may make an irrevocable transfer to a custodian for the benefit of the minor pursuant to W.S.

34-13-122

.

If a person having the right to do so under W.S. 34-13-116(a) has nominated a future custodian to receive the custodial property, the transfer shall be made to that person.

If no future custodian has been nominated, or all persons nominated as future custodian die before the transfer or are unable, decline or are ineligible to serve, a transfer under this section may be made to an adult member of the minor’s family or to a trust company unless the property exceeds ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) in value.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 201, § 1.

§ 34-13-121.
Receipt for custodial property.

A written receipt of the custodian constitutes a sufficient release and discharge for custodial property transferred to the custodian pursuant to this act [§§

34-13-114

through

34-13-137

].

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 201, § 1.

§ 34-13-122.
Manner of creating custodial property and effecting transfer; designation of initial custodian; control.

Custodial property is created and a transfer is effected when:

An uncertificated security or a certificated security in registered form is either:

Registered in the name of the transferor, an adult other than the transferor or a trust company, followed in substance by the words: “as custodian for . . . . . (name of minor) under the Wyoming Uniform Transfers to Minors Act [§§

34-13-114

through

34-13-137

]”; or

Delivered if in certificated form, or any document necessary for an uncertificated security is delivered, together with any necessary endorsement to an adult other than the transferor or to a trust company as custodian, accompanied by an instrument in substantially the form set forth in subsection (b) of this section.

Money is paid or delivered to a broker or financial institution for credit to an account in the name of the transferor, an adult other than the transferor or a trust company, followed in substance by the words: “as custodian for . . . . . (name of minor) under the Wyoming Uniform Transfers to Minors Act”;

The ownership of a life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract is either:

Registered with the issuer in the name of the transferor, an adult other than the transferor or a trust company, followed in substance by the words: “as custodian for . . . . . (name of minor) under the Wyoming Uniform Transfers to Minors Act”; or

Assigned in writing to an adult other than the transferor or to a trust company whose name in the assignment is followed in substance by the words: “as custodian for . . . . . (name of minor) under the Wyoming Uniform Transfers to Minors Act”.

An irrevocable exercise of a power of appointment or an irrevocable present right to future payment under a contract is the subject of a written notification delivered to the payor, issuer or other obligor that the right is transferred to the transferor, an adult other than the transferor or a trust company, whose name in the notification is followed in substance by the words: “as custodian for . . . . . (name of minor) under the Wyoming Uniform Transfers to Minors Act”;

An interest in real property is recorded in the name of the transferor, an adult other than the transferor or a trust company, followed in substance by the words: “as custodian for . . . . . (name of minor) under the Wyoming Uniform Transfers to Minors Act”;

A certificate of title issued by a department or agency of a state or of the United States which evidences title to tangible personal property is either:

Issued in the name of the transferor, an adult other than the transferor or a trust company, followed in substance by the words: “as custodian for . . . . . (name of minor) under the Wyoming Uniform Transfers to Minors Act”; or

Delivered to an adult other than the transferor or to a trust company, endorsed to that person followed in substance by the words: “as custodian for . . . . . (name of minor) under the Wyoming Uniform Transfers to Minors Act”.

An interest in any property not described in paragraphs (i) through (vi) of this section is transferred to an adult other than the transferor or to a trust company by a written instrument in substantially the form set forth in subsection (b) of this section.

An instrument in the following form satisfies the requirements of subparagraph (a)(i)(B) and paragraph (a)(vii) of this section:

“TRANSFER UNDER THE WYOMINGUNIFORM TRANSFERS TO MINORS ACT I, (name of transferor or name and representative capacity if a fiduciary) hereby transfer to (name of custodian), as custodian for (name of minor) under the Wyoming Uniform Transfers to Minors Act, the following: (insert a description of the custodial property sufficient to identify it). Dated: (Signature) (name of custodian) acknowledges receipt of the property described above as custodian for the minor named above under the Wyoming Uniform Transfers to Minors Act. Dated (Signature of Custodian) ”

Click to view

A transferor shall place the custodian in control of the custodial property as soon as practicable.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 201, § 1.

§ 34-13-123.
Single custodianship.

A transfer may be made for only one (1) minor, and only one (1) person may be the custodian. All custodial property held under this act [§§

34-13-114

through

34-13-137

] by the same custodian for the benefit of the same minor constitutes a single custodianship.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 201, § 1.

§ 34-13-124.
Validity and effect of transfer.

The validity of a transfer made in a manner prescribed in this act [§§

34-13-114

through

34-13-137

] is not affected by:

Failure of the transferor to comply with W.S.

34-13-122

(c) concerning possession and control;

Designation of an ineligible custodian, except designation of the transferor in the case of property for which the transferor is ineligible to serve as custodian under W.S.

34-13-122

(a); or

Death or incapacity of the person nominated under W.S.

34-13-116

or designated under W.S. 34-13-122 as custodian or the disclaimer of the office by that person.

A transfer made pursuant to W.S.

34-13-122

is irrevocable, and the custodial property is indefeasibly vested in the minor, but the custodian has all the rights, powers, duties and authority provided in this act, and neither the minor nor the minor’s legal representative has any right, power, duty or authority with respect to the custodial property except as provided in this act.

By making a transfer pursuant to this act, the transferor incorporates in the disposition all the provisions of this act and grants to the custodian, and to any third person dealing with a person designated as custodian, the respective powers, rights and immunities provided in this act.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 201, § 1.

§ 34-13-125.
Care of custodial property.

A custodian shall:

Take control of custodial property;

Register or record title to custodial property if appropriate; and

Collect, hold, manage, invest and reinvest custodial property.

In dealing with custodial property, a custodian shall observe the standard of care that would be observed by a prudent person dealing with property of another and is not limited by any other statute restricting investments by fiduciaries. If a custodian has special skills or is named custodian on the basis of representations of special skills or expertise, the custodian is under a duty to use those skills. However, a custodian, in the custodian’s discretion and without liability to the minor or the minor’s estate, may retain any custodial property received from a transferor.

A custodian may invest in or pay premiums on life insurance or endowment policies on:

The life of the minor only if the minor or the minor’s estate is the sole beneficiary; or

The life of another person in whom the minor has an insurable interest only to the extent that the minor, the minor’s estate or the custodian in the capacity of custodian is the irrevocable beneficiary.

A custodian at all times shall keep custodial property separate and distinct from all other property in a manner sufficient to identify it clearly as custodial property of the minor. Custodial property consisting of an undivided interest is so identified if the minor’s interest is held as a tenant in common and is fixed. Custodial property subject to recordation is so identified if it is recorded, and custodial property subject to registration is so identified if it is either registered, or held in an account designated, in the name of the custodian, followed in substance by the words: “as a custodian for . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . (name of minor) under the Wyoming Uniform Transfers to Minors Act [§§

34-13-114

through

34-13-137

]”.

A custodian shall keep records of all transactions with respect to custodial property, including information necessary for the preparation of the minor’s tax returns and shall make them available for inspection at reasonable intervals by a parent or legal representative of the minor or by the minor if the minor has attained the age of fourteen (14) years.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 201, § 1.

§ 34-13-126.
Powers of custodian.

A custodian acting in the capacity of custodian has all the rights, powers and authority over custodial property that unmarried adult owners have over their own property, but a custodian may exercise any of the rights, powers and authority over custodial property only in the capacity of custodian and not otherwise.

This section does not relieve a custodian from liability for breach of the provisions of W.S.

34-13-125

.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 201, § 1.

§ 34-13-127.
Use of custodial property.

A custodian may deliver or pay to the minor or expend for the minor’s benefit so much or all of the custodial property as the custodian considers advisable for the use and benefit of the minor, without court order and without regard to:

The duty or ability of the custodian personally or of any other person to support the minor; or

Any other income or property of the minor which may be applicable or available for that purpose.

The court, on the petition of an interested person or the minor if the minor has attained the age of fourteen (14) years, may order the custodian to deliver or pay to the minor or expend for the minor’s benefit so much of the custodial property as the court considers advisable for the use and benefit of the minor.

A delivery, payment or expenditure under this section is in addition to, not in substitution for, and does not affect, the obligation of any person to support the minor.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 201, § 1.

§ 34-13-128.
Custodian's expenses; compensation and bond.

A custodian is entitled to reimbursement from custodial property for reasonable expenses incurred in the performance of the custodian’s duties.

Except for a custodian who is a transferor under W.S.

34-13-117

, a custodian has a noncumulative election during each calendar year to charge reasonable compensation for services performed during that year.

A custodian is not required to give a bond for the performance of the custodian’s duties, except as provided in W.S. 34-13-131(f).

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 201, § 1.

§ 34-13-129.
Exemption of third persons from liability.

A third person in good faith and without court order may act on the instructions of or otherwise deal with any person purporting to make a transfer under this act [§§

34-13-114

through

34-13-137

] or purporting to act in the capacity of a custodian and, in the absence of actual knowledge, is not responsible for determining:

The validity of the purported custodian’s designation;

The regularity of, or the authority under this act for, any act of the purported custodian;

The validity or propriety under this act of any instrument or instructions executed or given either by the person purporting to make a transfer under this act or by the purported custodian; or

The propriety of the application of any property of the minor delivered to the purported custodian.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 201, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 34-13-130.
Liability to third persons.

A claim based on a contract entered into by a custodian acting as such, on an obligation arising from the ownership or control of custodial property, or on a tort committed during the custodianship may be asserted against the custodial property by proceeding against the custodian in the custodial capacity, whether or not the custodian or the minor is personally liable therefor.

A custodian is not personally liable:

On a contract properly entered into in the custodial capacity unless the custodian fails to reveal the custodial capacity and to identify the custodianship in the contract; or

For an obligation arising from control of custodial property or for a tort committed during the custodianship unless the custodian is personally at fault.

A minor is not personally liable for an obligation arising from ownership of custodial property or for a tort committed during the custodianship unless the minor is personally at fault.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 201, § 1.

§ 34-13-131.
Renunciation, resignation, death or removal of custodian; designation of successor custodian.

A person nominated under W.S.

34-13-116

or designated under W.S.

34-13-122

as custodian may decline to serve by delivering a valid disclaimer to the person who made the nomination or to the transferor or the transferor’s legal representative. If the event giving rise to a transfer has not occurred and no substitute future custodian able, willing and eligible to serve was nominated, the person who made the nomination may nominate a substitute future custodian; otherwise the transferor or the transferor’s legal representative shall designate a substitute custodian at the time of the transfer, in either case from among the persons eligible to serve as custodian for that kind of property under W.S.

34-13-122

(a). The custodian so designated has the rights of a successor custodian.

A custodian at any time may designate a trust company or an adult other than a transferor under W.S.

34-13-117

as successor custodian by executing and dating an instrument of designation before a subscribing witness other than the successor. If the instrument of designation does not contain or is not accompanied by the resignation of the custodian, the designation of the successor does not take effect until the custodian resigns, dies, becomes incapacitated or is removed.

A custodian may resign at any time by delivering written notice to the minor if the minor has attained the age of fourteen (14) years and to the successor custodian and by transferring the custodial property to the successor custodian.

If a custodian is ineligible, dies or becomes incapacitated without having effectively designated a successor and the minor has attained the age of fourteen (14) years, the minor may designate as successor custodian, in the manner prescribed in subsection (b) of this section, an adult member of the minor’s family, a conservator of the minor or a trust company. If the minor has not attained the age of fourteen (14) years or fails to act within sixty (60) days after the ineligibility, death or incapacity, the conservator of the minor becomes successor custodian. If the minor has no conservator or the conservator declines to act, the transferor, the legal representative of the transferor or of the custodian, an adult member of the minor’s family or any other interested person may petition the court to designate a successor custodian.

A custodian who disclaims under subsection (a) of this section or resigns under subsection (c) of this section, or the legal representative of a deceased or incapacitated custodian, as soon as practicable shall put the custodial property and records in the possession and control of the successor custodian. The successor custodian may enforce the obligation to deliver custodial property and records and becomes responsible for each item as received.

A transferor, the legal representative of a transferor, an adult member of the minor’s family, a guardian of the person of the minor, the conservator of the minor or the minor if the minor has attained the age of fourteen (14) years may petition the court to remove the custodian for cause and to designate a successor custodian other than a transferor under W.S.

34-13-117

or to require the custodian to give appropriate bond.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 201, § 1.

§ 34-13-132.
Accounting by and determination of liability of custodian.

A minor who has attained the age of fourteen (14) years, the minor’s guardian of the person or legal representative, an adult member of the minor’s family, a transferor or a transferor’s legal representative may petition the court:

For an accounting by the custodian or the custodian’s legal representative; or

For a determination of responsibility as between the custodial property and the custodian personally for claims against the custodial property unless the responsibility has been adjudicated in an action referred to in W.S.

34-13-130

to which the minor or the minor’s legal representative was a party.

A successor custodian may petition the court for an accounting by the predecessor custodian.

The court, in a proceeding under this act [§§

34-13-114

through

34-13-137

] or in any other proceeding, may require or permit the custodian or the custodian’s legal representative to account.

If a custodian is removed under W.S. 34-13-131(f), the court shall require an accounting and order delivery of the custodial property and records to the successor custodian and the execution of all instruments required for transfer of the custodial property.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 201, § 1.

§ 34-13-133.
Termination of custodianship.

The custodian shall transfer in an appropriate manner the custodial property to the minor or to the minor’s estate upon the earlier of:

The minor’s attainment of twenty-one (21) years of age with respect to custodial property transferred under W.S.

34-13-117

or

34-13-118

, unless the time of transfer of the custodial property to the minor is changed under W.S.

34-13-138

or

34-13-139

;

The minor’s attainment of majority under the laws of this state other than this act with respect to custodial property transferred under W.S.

34-13-119

or

34-13-120

, unless the time of transfer of the custodial property to the minor is changed under W.S.

34-13-138

or

34-13-139

;

The minor’s death.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 201, § 1; 2017 ch. 154, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

As to age of majority and rights upon emancipation, see §

14-1-101

.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, inserted “unless the time of transfer of the custodial property to the minor is changed under W.S.

34-13-138

or

34-13-139

” at the end of (a)(i) and (a)(ii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 34-13-134.
Applicability of provisions.

This act [§§

34-13-114

through

34-13-137

] applies to a transfer within the scope of W.S.

34-13-115

made after its effective date if:

The transfer purports to have been made under the Uniform Gifts to Minors Act of Wyoming; or

The instrument by which the transfer purports to have been made uses in substance the designation “as custodian under the Uniform Gifts to Minors Act” or “as custodian under the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act” of any other state, and the application of this act is necessary to validate the transfer.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 201, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 1987, ch. 201, § 3, made the act effective on May 22, 1987.

Uniform Gifts to Minors Act. —

See note under same catchline following §

34-13-115

.

§ 34-13-135.
Effect on existing custodianships.

Any transfer of custodial property as now defined in this act [§§

34-13-114

through

34-13-137

] purporting to have been made before the effective date of this act is validated notwithstanding that there was no specific authority in the Uniform Gifts to Minors Act of Wyoming for the coverage of custodial property of that kind or for a transfer from that source at the time the transfer was made.

The provisions of this act apply to all transfers made in a manner and form prescribed in the Uniform Gifts to Minors Act of Wyoming except insofar as the application impairs constitutionally vested rights or extends the duration of custodianships in existence on the effective date of this act.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 201, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1987, ch. 201, § 3, makes the act effective on May 22, 1987.

Uniform Gifts to Minors Act. —

See note under same catchline following §

34-13-115

.

Effect of repeal of Wyoming Uniform Gifts to Minors Act. —

Laws 1987, ch. 201, § 2, provides: “To the extent that this act does not, pursuant to W.S. 34-13-135(b), apply to transfers made in a manner prescribed in the Wyoming Uniform Gifts to Minors Act or to the powers, duties and immunities conferred by transfers in that manner upon custodians and persons dealing with custodians, the repeal of the Wyoming Uniform Gifts to Minors Act [§§

34-13-101

through 34-13-110] does not affect those transfers or those powers, duties and immunities.”

§ 34-13-136.
Uniform construction of provisions.

This act [§§

34-13-114

through

34-13-137

] shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this act among states enacting it.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 201, § 1.

§ 34-13-137.
Short title.

This act [§§

34-13-114

through

34-13-137

] may be cited as the “Wyoming Uniform Transfers to Minors Act”.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 201, § 1.

§ 34-13-138.
Changing the time for transfer of custodial property.

Subject to the requirements and limitations of this section, the time for transfer to the minor of custodial property transferred under W.S.

34-13-116

through

34-13-119

may be changed to a specified time other than the minor’s attainment of twenty-one (21) years of age, which time shall be specified in the transfer pursuant to W.S.

34-13-122

.

To specify a changed time for transfer to the minor of the custodial property, the words “as custodian for .... (name of minor) until age .... (age for delivery of property to minor) under the Wyoming Uniform Transfers to Minors Act” shall be substituted in substance for the words “as custodian for .... (name of minor) under the Wyoming Uniform Transfers to Minors Act” in making the transfer pursuant to W.S.

34-13-122

.

The time for transfer to the minor of custodial property transferred under or pursuant to W.S.

34-13-116

or

34-13-118

may be changed under this section only if the governing will, trust or nomination provides in substance that the custodianship is to continue until the minor’s attainment of a specified age, which time shall not be later than the minor’s attainment of thirty (30) years of age, and in that case the governing will, trust or nomination shall determine the time to be specified in the transfer pursuant to W.S.

34-13-122

.

The time for transfer to the minor of custodial property transferred by irrevocable gift or the irrevocable exercise of a power of appointment under W.S.

34-13-117

may be changed under this section only if the transfer pursuant to W.S.

34-13-122

provides in substance that the custodianship is to continue until the minor’s attainment of a specified age, which time shall not be later than the minor’s attainment of thirty (30) years of age.

The time for transfer to the minor of custodial property transferred by a trustee under W.S.

34-13-119

may be changed under this section only if the transfer pursuant to W.S.

34-13-122

provides that the custodianship is to continue until a specified time not later than the earlier of:

The minor’s attainment of thirty (30) years of age;

The time of termination of all present beneficial interests of the minor in the trust from which the custodial property was transferred.

If the transfer pursuant to W.S.

34-13-122

does not specify any age, the time for the transfer of the custodial property to the minor under W.S.

34-13-133

is the time when the minor attains twenty-one (21) years of age.

If the transfer pursuant to W.S.

34-13-122

provides in substance that the duration of the custodianship is for a time longer than the maximum time permitted by this section for the duration of a custodianship created by that type of transfer, the custodianship shall be deemed to continue only until the minor’s attainment of the maximum age permitted by this section for the duration of a custodianship created by that type of transfer.

History.

2017 ch. 154, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective date. —

Laws 2017, ch. 154, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

§ 34-13-139.
Extension of custodial term by custodian.

A custodian may extend the custodial term under this section to an age older than the age that is specified by this act or a transferring instrument made under W.S.

34-13-122

, subject to the right of the minor to compel immediate distribution under subsection (c) of this section.

To extend the custodial term under subsection (a) of this section, the custodian shall give the minor written notice of the custodian’s intent to extend the custodial term. The notice must specify the duration of the extension by indicating the new custodial term and must inform the minor of the minor’s right to compel immediate distribution under subsection (c) of this section. The custodian shall give the notice during the later of the following periods:

The six (6) month period that precedes the last day of the custodial term; or

The six (6) month period that begins when the minor attains twenty-one (21) years of age.

Rather than permit the extension of the custodial term, the minor may compel immediate distribution of all or part of the custodial property by giving written notice to the custodian:

During the six (6) month period that begins on the last day of the current custodial term; or

Within ninety (90) days after receiving the custodian’s notice under subsection (b) of this section.

If a minor does not exercise the minor’s right to compel distribution under subsection (c) of this section, the custodial term shall be extended as indicated in the custodian’s notice given under subsection (b) of this section, and the minor may not compel the immediate distribution of custodial property before the end of the custodial term, as extended.

A custodian may extend the custodial term more than once under this section.

As used in this section, “custodial term” means the time provided in or allowed by this act during which the custodian is directed to hold custodial property until the property is transferred to the minor.

History.

2017 ch. 154, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective date. —

Laws 2017, ch. 154, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.